Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

General Provisions

43-20-101. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to promote the growth and development of the soybean industry in Tennessee by research, advertisement, promotions and education and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of this state.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-3001.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

Comparative Legislation. Soybean promotion:

Ala. Code § 2-8-80 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-20-401 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 247.510 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-9-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-684.1 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
3.3-3.6.

43-20-102. Board — Composition — Appointment — Terms — Bond of officers — Meetings — Rules and regulations — Compensation.

The Tennessee soybean promotion board, referred to in this chapter as the board, is created, to be composed of nine (9) members to be appointed by the commissioner of agriculture to serve for terms of three (3) years, as provided in this section. All of the nine (9) members of the board shall be producers of soybeans in the state of Tennessee. Within ten (10) days following July 1, 1977, the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, the Tennessee Farmers Cooperative, and the Tennessee Soybean Association shall each submit the names of six (6) soybean producers to the commissioner, and the commissioner shall appoint three (3) members from the nominees of each organization to serve on the board on rotating three-year terms. The original board shall be appointed with members of each of the organizations appointed as follows: one (1) for one (1) year, one (1) for two (2) years and one (1) for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of board members' terms, each organization shall submit the names of three (3) nominees to the commissioner, and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the commissioner in the same manner, giving equal representation to each organization. Vacancies that occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made. Persons who are appointed to the board shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive terms. The commissioner or a designee from the commissioner's staff shall serve as an advisor to the board.

The members of the board shall meet and organize within thirty (30) days of their appointment, and shall elect a chair, vice chair and secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, each to serve for one-year terms, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by such officers or specifically designated by the board. The chair, vice chair and secretary-treasurer shall be bonded in an amount of not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The cost of the bonds shall be paid from the funds received under this part. The bond shall be a security for any unlawful act of such member of the board, and recovery on the bond may be had by the state for any injury by such unlawful act of the member. The board may establish rules and regulations for its own government and the administration of the affairs of the board.

Members of the board shall not be compensated but shall be reimbursed travel expenses in accordance with the travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-3002; Acts 1985, ch. 108, §§ 16, 17; 1987, ch. 183, §§ 3, 4; 1987, ch. 352, §§ 3, 4; 2014, ch. 620, §§ 3, 5.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee soybean promotion board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, in (a), rewrote the next to the last sentence which read: “No member of the board shall be eligible to serve successive terms on the board.”; and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 620, § 6. April 4, 2014.

43-20-103. Assessment levied on producers — Promotion fund — Records of purchasers.

There is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of one cent (1¢) per bushel on all soybeans grown within the state of Tennessee, by producers desiring to execute forms stating their desire to participate as set out in this section, and this assessment shall be deducted by the purchaser from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale. The producer shall so indicate the choice to participate or not on proper forms provided by the department of agriculture, referred to in this part as the “department,” and that are available at every facility where soybeans are purchased from producers. If a producer elects not to participate, the purchaser shall not withhold the assessment at the time of the sale or at any later time.

The total assessment imposed and levied by this part shall be payable to and collected by the department, from the purchaser of such soybeans at the first point of sale, within ten (10) days after the end of each calendar quarter. The proceeds of the assessment collected by the department shall then be deposited in a special fund to be established as the “Tennessee soybean promotion fund,” and disbursement from the fund shall be made upon authorization of the commissioner of agriculture and the commissioner of finance and administration as requested, on requisitions signed by the chair and secretary-treasurer of the Tennessee soybean promotion board.

The commissioner shall quarterly pay over to the Tennessee soybean promotion fund all funds collected, less not more than ten percent (10%) of the gross amount collected for department expenses. The quarterly settlement to the board shall be made on or before the twentieth day of October, January, April and July of each year, and shall be accompanied by a complete report of all funds collected, disbursed, and associated departmental expenses.

Each purchaser shall keep a complete and accurate record of all soybeans handled by that purchaser, and shall furnish each producer with a signed sales slip showing the number of bushels purchased from the producer and the amount deducted by the purchaser for the Tennessee soybean promotion fund or noting the producer's exemption under subsection (a). Such records shall be in such form and contain such other information as the department shall by rule or regulation prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the purchaser for a period of two (2) years and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon oral or written demand by the department or any duly authorized agent or representative of the department. Every purchaser, at such time or times as the department may require, shall submit reports or other documentary information deemed necessary for the efficient and equitable collection of the assessment imposed in this part. The department has the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any purchaser of soybeans and examine or cause to be examined by an agent, any books, papers and records that deal in any way with the payment of the assessment or enforcement of this part.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-3003; Acts 2002, ch. 737, § 3.

Cross-References. Assessment levied on producers, § 43-20-205.

Records of purchasers, § 43-20-209.

43-20-104. Failure of purchaser to file report or pay assessment — Violations — Penalties.

Any purchaser who fails to file a report or to pay any assessment within the time required by the department shall forfeit to the department a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due, plus one percent (1%) of that amount for each month of delay or fraction thereof after the first month after the report was required to be filed or the assessment became due. The penalty shall be paid over to the board and shall be disposed of by it in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed.

The department shall collect the penalties levied in this section, together with the delinquent assessment, by either of the following methods:

By voluntary payment by the person liable; and

By legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this part who fails to remit the same or who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises, or books, records or other documents relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed in this part, or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent an inspection, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 4; T.C.A., § 43-3004; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-20-105. Funds used for research and promotion — Political use of funds prohibited — Reports.

The board shall plan and conduct a program of productive research, education, market development and advertising designed to promote the soybean industry in Tennessee, and is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessment imposed in this part for those purposes, including basic administrative expenses of the plan. The board may also, in its discretion, expend money from the Tennessee soybean promotion fund outside the state of Tennessee for such purposes as national and international research and promotional applications.

Funds may be expended only for the purposes set out in this part and shall not be spent in any manner for political purposes. A report of all expenditures shall be made annually, with four (4) copies of the report to be filed with each of the following: the department of agriculture, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the chief clerk of the senate and the state library and archives.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 5; T.C.A., § 43-3005.

Cross-References. Use of funds, § 43-20-212.

43-20-106. Exemptions from part.

This part does not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or fewer bushels of soybeans in any calendar year; provided, that the person is not regularly engaged in the purchase of soybeans.

Acts 1977, ch. 208, § 4; T.C.A., § 43-3006.